Arkansas, session 2025, HB1565.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Records published online by county assessors are for the
convenience of a property owner;
(2) Online records afford a property owner the ability to pay
taxes and fees online;
(3) County assessors in Arkansas are not required by law to
publish records online however, certain records are available upon request;
and
(4) Property owners may desire to opt out of having their
records placed online for privacy or other reasons.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-14-111(b), concerning county government
*SSS200*
02/24/2025 11:05:13 AM SSS200

HB1565
use of electronic records, is amended to add an additional subdivision to
read as follows:
(4) "Online database" means a website with administrative rights
retained by a county official that is used by members of the public to search
public records maintained by the office of the county official.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 14-14-111, concerning county government use
of electronic records, is amended to add additional subsections to read as
follows:
(e)(1) A county assessor who maintains an online database for property
records shall allow a property owner to opt out of making the property
owner's information available on the online database.
(2) To opt out of having the property owner's information
included in the online database under subdivision (e)(1) of this section, the
property owner shall submit a request in writing to the county assessor
stating the property owner's intent to opt out of the online database.
(f) The Assessment Coordination Division may promulgate rules to
create and maintain the forms necessary to submit a request under subsection
(e) of this section.

















02/24/2025 11:05:13 AM SSS200